Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,117
Parolee; conditions of parole.

The Board of Parole may in appropriate cases require a parolee, as a condition of his parole, either at the time of his release on parole or at any time while he remains under parole supervision, to reside in a community guidance center, boarding facility, halfway house, hospital, or other special residence facility, for such period and under such supervision or treatment as the board may deem appropriate.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 48, p. 3098.